src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages

# North Saami noun declension

Bisyllabic nouns

* **LEXICON GOAHTI-A** divided into a-i-u due to errortag-branch

* **LEXICON GOAHTI-I** divided into a-i-u due to errortag-branch

* **LEXICON GOAHTI-U** divided into a-i-u due to errortag-branch

* **LEXICON GOAHTI** Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms goahte-,long/short gen

* **LEXICON GOAHTI-IU** Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms goahte-,long/short gen

* **LEXICON MOARSI** Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms goahte-,long/short gen, optional diph simpl

* **LEXICON GOAHTILONG** Long nom-compound-forms, long gen

* **LEXICON GOAHTILONGSHORT** Sometimes long nom-compound-forms, long gen

* **LEXICON ALBMI** Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms, long gen.

* **LEXICON ALBMILONG** Bisyll. V-Nouns. Long nom-compound-forms, long gen.

* **LEXICON GOAHTI_CGforms** Bisyll. V-Nouns. Forms that usually get CG. This lexicon is mostly meant for adding Err/Orth forms wihout CG to lemmas, which should have CG, like reabbá:reabbáid

* **LEXICON ALBMILONGSHORT** Bisyll. V-Nouns. Long/SHORT nom-compound-forms, long gen.

* **LEXICON AIGI-I** Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms, short gen.

* **LEXICON AIGI** Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms, short gen.

* **LEXICON STAHTA** Bisyll. Non-Gradating a-Nouns; i-Illative

it does not have the Prop tag.

Bisyllabic nouns
2f. Actor lexicas

* **LEXICON IIJA** loan words ending -iija; also with only -i as Err/Orth, like galleri

* **LEXICON ESSEIJA** loan words ending -ija; Illative -ijai as well -ijii: kopiijai, kopiijii

* **LEXICON KAIJA** 

* **LEXICON IIVA** -iivva loan words.

* **LEXICON PROFIILA**  -iila Loan words.

* **LEXICON STEMVOWELforms** For alternative stem vowel, e.g. -o 

* **LEXICON STRUKTUR** Recent loanwords on -vra with short cmp-form: struktur-

* **LEXICON KULTUR** -kultuvra, compound forms: kultur-, kulttor-

* **LEXICON KANTUVRA** word with many forms

* **LEXICON GANTOR_N** word with many forms

* **LEXICON MAŠIIDNA** mašiidna with short cmp-forms as well

* **LEXICON MÁŠEN** 

* **LEXICON BENSIN** bensiidna with short cmp-forms as well

* **LEXICON ADRENALIN** Recent loanwords on -iidna with short cmp-form as well

* **LEXICON TELEFON** Recent loanwords on -vdna with short cmp-form as well

* **LEXICON AKTION** akšuvdna with cmp form ákšun- as well

* **LEXICON NATION** naššuvdna with short cmp form náššon as well

* **LEXICON KANON** kanovdna with short cmp form kánon/kánun as well

* **LEXICON SOSIAL** Recent loanwords on -ála with both short and long cmp-form

* **LEXICON ARENA**  Vowel-final loan words without Gradation and Ill ^change

* **LEXICON BANDY**  Vowel-final loan words without Gradation and Ill ^change

* **LEXICON MEDIA**  Vowel-final loan words without Gradation and Ill ^change, with -i(i)ja Err/Orth

* **LEXICON OBOE**  oe-final loan words without Gradation and Ill ^change

* **LEXICON STANDUP** consonant fin loanwords, 

* **LEXICON ESSAYA** recent loanwords on vow+a

* **LEXICON MASAI** only masai

* **LEXICON BASSI** words on -bassi. Long nom-compound-forms, short gen, long heapmi-caritive

* **LEXICON MUOHTU** words on -muohtu. Short nom-compound-forms, short gen, long heapmi-caritive

* **LEXICON EADNI** eadni, gudni, ádnu. Short nom-compound-forms, long gen, short caritive

* **LEXICON VALDI** words on -váldi. Short nom-compound-forms, long gen, short caritive, away with Px "váldán"

* **LEXICON LOTLOHKU** words on -lotlohku. Long/SHORT nom-compound-forms, long gen.

* **LEXICON SAPMI** Bisyll. V-Nouns. No nom-compounding, short gen.

* **LEXICON DARRU** Bisyll. V-Nouns. No nom-compounding, short gen.

* **LEXICON DUISKA** Bisyll. V-Nouns. No nom-compounding, short gen.

* **LEXICON XGIELLA** Bisyll. V-Nouns. No nom-compounding, short gen.

* **LEXICON BEALLE** words ending -bealle. Short nom-compound-forms, short gen.

* **LEXICON TAXI** dákse and tákse

* **LEXICON LUONDU** this word (+vuohta) because of behavior in compounds, where it is normally in SgGen: luonddubiebmu

* **LEXICON GOADA-LUONDU**

* **LEXICON NPx2V-LUONDU**

* **LEXICON RUVTTO** only this word because of it's Err/Orths 

* **LEXICON RUOKTU** only this word because of its behavior in compounds, where it is normally in SgGen: ruovttu-/ruovtto-

* **LEXICON MADIDJA** máđi and cmp

* **LEXICON GENTLEMAN**  gentleman (stem mana-)

* **LEXICON DUOHKI** *duohki* and compounds, for disamb. reasons

* **LEXICON BUDEITA** Rather special word: buđeita

* **LEXICON MANNI** words on -mánni. Long/SHORT nom-compound-forms, long gen.ILL:mánnii/mánnái

* **LEXICON MANNI-INFL**

* **LEXICON OLLUVUOHTA** Exceptional vuohta-Noun

* **LEXICON LEXMUSH** derived verbs on -muš

* **LEXICON OLGU** only olgu. Short nom-compound-form, short gen. Incomplete paradigm

* **LEXICON MIEHTI** nuorta, nuorti, oarji, miehti. Short nom-compound-forms, long gen. Incomplete paradigm

* **LEXICON LULLI** lulli and davvi. Long/SHORT nom-compound-forms, long gen. Incomplete paradigm

* **LEXICON GADDI** Bisyll. V-Nouns with Comparative Forms.  Short nom-compound-forms, long gen.

* **LEXICON RIDDU** Bisyll. V-Nouns with Comparative Forms.  Short nom-compound-forms, long gen.

* **LEXICON RAFI** ráfit, ráfimus  

* **LEXICON -RAFI** words on -ráfi. Long nom-compound-forms, long gen. short heapmi-caritive

* **LEXICON GADDILONGSHORT** NB! No SgIll and SgLoc (not directed to GOADI-, GODII- or GOAHTAI) because *davvi* is the only word this far Bisyll. V-Nouns with Comp. Forms, long-short nomcmp, long gencmp

* **LEXICON GADDISHORT** Bisyll. V-Nouns with Comparative Forms.  Short nom-compound-forms, SHORT gen.

* **LEXICON OARJI** máddi, nuorti, nuorta, oarji. Comparative Forms.  Short nom-compound-forms, long gen. Incomplete paradigms

* **LEXICON LULLILONG** long compound forms

* **LEXICON VARRA**  varra and uvdna. No -laš, to get rid of varalaš and uvnnalaš from speller

* **LEXICON LASSA**  want this without essive Px: *lassanan, *lassanat, *lassaneame

* **LEXICON AKCU**  No -heapme, no wg+Foc/han (thereby avoiding ávččuhit, ávččuhan, ávččuhat in speller) Short nom-compound-form ákčo-,long/short gen

* **LEXICON JAHKI** Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms, long gen. to avoid jahkán, jagát

* **LEXICON OAHPPA** Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms goahte-,long/short gen, to avoid oahppasat

* **LEXICON NPxC-OAHPPA**

* **LEXICON BLV** Bisyll. V-Nouns. Long nom-compound-forms, long gen., to avoid bálvát, Bihttánis

* **LEXICON NPx2V-BLV**

* **LEXICON NPxC-BLV**

* **LEXICON Px2V-BLV** for second person vowel stems

* **LEXICON SOABBI** Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms goahte-,long/short gen, to avoid SOABBÁT, gáldot, searván, laktasan

* **LEXICON VIIDNA** Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms goahte-,long/short gen, to avoid SOABBÁT, gáldot, searván, laktasan

* **LEXICON NPx1V-SOABBI**

* **LEXICON NPxC-SOABBI**

* **LEXICON IVDNI** Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms, short gen. preventing ivnnát, rivgot

* **LEXICON NPx2V-IVDNI**

* **LEXICON Px2V-IVDNI** for second person vowel stems

* **LEXICON DAHKU** Like ALBMILONG Bisyll. V-Nouns. Long nom-compound-forms, long gen. Without +Sg+Nom/Gen/Acc+PxSg1 to avoid "dahkon"

* **LEXICON SADJA** Bisyll. V-Nouns. Long nom-compound-forms, long gen. TO AVOID SÁDJÁI

* **LEXICON DAHPPA** dahpa, dáhpa and dáhppa. to avoid dáhpahuvvat, dahpahuvvat etc in speller

* **LEXICON LAHKI** the words on -láhki. Because in speller we want to aviod boasttoláhkái, borranláhki etc. (borran láhkai)

* **LEXICON NPxC-LAHKI**

* **LEXICON BEARRI**  to avoid unfortunate diminutives like bearáš and salaš in speller (bearaš, sálaš) +  "beassán" = beassi+Sg+Nom/Gen/Acc+PxSg1

* **LEXICON VUOSTA**  to avoid unfortunate diminutives like bearáš and salaš in speller (bearaš, sálaš) +  "beassán" = beassi+Sg+Nom/Gen/Acc+PxSg1

* **LEXICON ACTORGEAHCCI** +CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG

* **LEXICON ACTORGEAHCCICT**  Actors, to avoid geahččán, jábmán, geahččát, jábmát

* **LEXICON ACTORVALDI** lexicalized actors because we have restricted verb derivation for speller. Long compound-forms, without "váldán"

2f. Actor lexicas

* **LEXICON ACTOR** +CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG

* **LEXICON ACTORCT** nowadays tagged NomAg. Long compound-forms

* **LEXICON ACTOR-PL** Plurals

* **LEXICON EADDJI-NomAg** +CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG  tagged NomAg. Sometimes long compound-forms

* **LEXICON ACTORLONGSHORT** +CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG

* **LEXICON ACTORLONGSHORTCT-nomag** adds +NomAg

* **LEXICON ACTORLONGSHORTCT** nowadays tagged NomAg. Sometimes long compound-forms

* **LEXICON ACTORSHORT** +CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG

* **LEXICON ACTORSHORTCT** nowadays tagged NomAg. Short compound-forms

+Use/NG:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon     no dipth simpl

* **LEXICON BOAHTALADDAN**  Intransitiv Action nouns from deverbal verbs

* **LEXICON IHTALUDDAMAT**  ihtaluddamat, plural

* **LEXICON UPMI** action noun, from passive verb

* **LEXICON EGEZHAGAT**  reciprocals like verddežagat, jumežagat etc

* **LEXICON BUVSSAT** Pl. bisyll vow-fin. Short cmp-forms

* **LEXICON BUVSSATLONG** Pl. bisyll vow-fin. Short cmp-forms

* **LEXICON MUODUT** muođut only, plural

* **LEXICON DEAHKIT** like AIGI but plural only

* **LEXICON DIEDUT** like ALBMI but plural only

* **LEXICON BORALMASAT** like JOHTOLAT but plural only

* **LEXICON DURVAT** like LASIS but pl. only

Trisyllabic nouns

* **LEXICON MATTAR** Short compound-forms Tris. Anim. Gradating C-Nouns

* **LEXICON MALIS** Short compound-forms Tris. Inanim. Gradating C-Nouns

* **LEXICON MALIS_CGforms**   Tris. Inanim. Gradating C-Nouns

* **LEXICON GAHPIR_CGforms**  Inanim. Non-gradating C-Nouns

* **LEXICON MINISTTAR**  Loanword. Trisyllm CG. Err/Orth as bisyll without CG.

* **LEXICON MALISLONG**  Long compound-forms Tris. Inanim. Gradating C-Nouns, vowel change

* **LEXICON BOAGAN**  Long compound-forms Tris. Inanim. Gradating C-Nouns, no vowel change

* **LEXICON MALISLONGSHORT**  Long and short compound-forms. Tris. Inanim. Gradating C-Nouns

* **LEXICON BEANA** Short compound-forms. Trisyll. Anim. Gradating 0-Nouns

* **LEXICON SEAMU** Short compound-forms. Trisyll. Inanim. Gradating 0-Nouns

* **LEXICON SEAMU_CGforms** Short compound-forms. Trisyll. Inanim. Gradating 0-Nouns

* **LEXICON SEAMULONG** Long compound-forms. Trisyll. Inanim. Gradating 0-Nouns

* **LEXICON REVISOR** Loanword. Trisyll. Err/Orth as bisyll.

* **LEXICON GAHPIR** Short compound-forms. Trisyll. Non-Gradating C-Nouns

* **LEXICON GAHPIRLONGSHORT** Long and short compound-forms. Trisyll. Non-Gradating C-Nouns

* **LEXICON GAHPIRLONG** Long compound-forms. Trisyll. Non-Gradating C-Nouns

Trisyllabic nouns

* **LEXICON EANA** eana, eanan, eatnan

* **LEXICON DOAVTTIR** only doavttir. Short compound-forms

* **LEXICON OVCCIS_N**  Collective numerals gallis, moattes, moattis, máŋggas

* **LEXICON CIEZAS_N**  Collective numerals

* **LEXICON VIDAS_N**  Collective numerals

* **LEXICON HUONAS** Tris. Gradating C-Nouns, with -s instead of -š. The Troms declension: huonas:huotnaha

* **LEXICON DAIVVAS** Tris. Gradating C-Nouns, The Troms declension: dáivvaš:dáivaha, bearaš:bearraha, njunuš:njunnoha

* **LEXICON BOADA** Short compound-forms. Trisyll. Inanim. Gradating 0-Nouns  TO AVOID BOAĐAN

* **LEXICON DAHPPAGA**  the dáhpahuvvá fix nr2. to avoid dahpahuvvat in speller

* **LEXICON ENGEL** Restricted denominals for speller   -eŋgel

* **LEXICON MAGASH** reciprocals like verddežat, jumežat etc

* **LEXICON BADJOSAT** Pl. bajus:badjosat, short cmp-form

* **LEXICON BADJOSATLONG** Pl. bajus:badjosat, long cmp-form

* **LEXICON ALIMAT** Pl. alin:alimat, like GAHPIR but pl only

* **LEXICON CEAKCAGAT** Like seamu but plural only

* **LEXICON VUOIGNAHAT** LikeDAIVVAS but only Pl. vuoiŋŋaš:vuoigŋahat

* **LEXICON EAMOSH** váikkuheamoš, deverbals

* **LEXICON AMOSH** váikkuhamoš, deverbals
